Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-849
Reduction in force; noncompliance with federal or state law; how treated.

Notwithstanding sections 79-846 to 79-848, if the reduction of an employee based upon the provisions of such sections would place a district in noncompliance of any federal or state laws or regulations requiring affirmative action employment practices, the district may vary from these provisions as necessary to comply with such laws or regulations.

Laws 1978, LB 375, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1254.08;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 479.